Maryland, session 2025, HB1279.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
10–103.
IF A UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT IS REQUIRED BY LAW TO ADOPT
REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT A PROGRAM THAT IS AUTHORIZED OR REQUIRED
UNDER STATE LAW, THE UNIT MAY NOT COLLECT ANY FEE OR OTHER PAYMENT
UNDER THAT PROGRAM UNTIL THE UNIT FINALIZES ADOPTION OF THE
REGULATIONS THAT IMPLEMENT THE PROGRAM.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1279*